Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessment for Promotion of Egg Industry

247.850.
Purpose.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that all handlers, dealers, processors, wholesalers, and retailers of eggs shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly in promoting and stimulating the increased production, use and sale, domestic and foreign, of eggs through research, market development, and education.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

247.851.
Definitions for KRS 247.852 to 247.865.

As used in KRS

247.852

to

247.865

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Dealer” means a person, organization, or cooperative engaged in the business of buying eggs from producers, either on his own account or as an agent, and selling or transferring eggs by the case to a wholesaler, processor, retailer, or other person;

“Handler” means a dealer, processor, or wholesaler;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, or association, and shall include any trustee, receiver or similar representative;

“Processor” means a person who operates a plant for the purpose of breaking eggs for freezing or drying;

“Retailer” means any person selling or offering for sale eggs to consumers in this state; and

“Wholesaler” means a person who assembles eggs in case lots and disposes of them in quantities to retailers, or through other distribution channels.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

247.852.
Activity not deemed restraint of trade.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

and intended to benefit all of the producers, retailers, and handlers of eggs shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 3, effective July 15. 1980.

247.853.
Referendum levying assessment.

It is hereby further declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that handlers of eggs shall be permitted by referendum to be held subject to the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

to levy upon themselves an assessment on eggs and provide for the collection of the same for the purpose of financing or contributing towards the financing of a program of research, market development, and education to increase the domestic and foreign consumption, use, sale and markets for eggs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 4, effective July 15, 1980.

247.854.
Application for assessment referendum — Contents of form — Publication.

Any existing association which is fairly representative of the handlers of eggs in the state, such as the Kentucky Poultry Federation, Inc., may at any time after the enactment of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by the board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the handlers of eggs upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

and collecting and utilizing the same for the purpose stated in the referendum. Such application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers, retailers, and handlers;

Brief statement of how the program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide or an area basis;

Proposed effective date of the program;

Geographic area, by counties, of handlers to be affected by the program; and

Signature of the applicant.

Upon receipt of the application, the commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 5, effective July 15, 1980.

247.855.
Certified association authorized to hold referendum.

Upon being so certified by the Commissioner of Agriculture, the association shall thereupon be fully authorized and empowered to hold and conduct on the part of the handlers of eggs a referendum on the question of whether or not such handlers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under, and subject to, and for the purpose stated in KRS

247.850

to

247.865

. Such referendum may be conducted either on a statewide or an area basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 6, effective July 15, 1980.

247.856.
Referendum on area or statewide basis — Participation eligibility.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

may be held either on an area or a statewide basis, as may be determined by such duly certified association before the referendum is called; and the referendum on an area or a statewide basis, may be participated in by all handlers of eggs. In the referendum, individuals so eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether or not there shall be levied an annual assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 7, effective July 15, 1980.

247.857.
Supervision of referendum by Commissioner — Expenses.

The manner, conduct and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 8, effective July 15, 1980.

247.858.
Commissioner to determine date, hours, polling places for voting and details of assessment — Limits.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall, before calling and announcing the referendum, fix, determine and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined for the referendum, the date, hours and polling places for voting in the referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which such assessment shall be collected if authorized by the handlers, and the general purposes to which the amount so collected shall be applied. No assessment levied under the provisions of any referendum shall exceed one cent ($0.01) for each fifteen (15) dozen lot of eggs or portion thereof bought or sold by a handler.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 9, effective July 15, 1980.

247.859.
Details of and rules governing referendum prescribed by Commissioner — Notice.

The hours, voting places, rules and regulations, and the area within which the referendum will be conducted shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture. The said referendum date, area, hours, voting places, and rules and regulations with respect to the holding of the referendum shall be published by the Commissioner through the medium of the public press in the state at least thirty (30) days before holding the referendum, and direct written notice thereof shall likewise be given to each county or area agent in any county covered by the referendum. Such notice shall likewise contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, which assessment in any event shall not exceed one cent ($0.01) for each fifteen (15) dozen lot of eggs or portion thereof bought or sold by a handler, and shall likewise state the method by which such assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds thereof shall be administered and the purposes to which the same shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 10, effective July 15, 1980.

247.860.
Preparation of question — Poll holders — Canvass and declaration of results.

The Commissioner shall likewise prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum the question to be presented to the voters and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum. Following the referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter, the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 11, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 360, § 74, effective July 15, 1982.

247.861.
Effect of affirmative vote.

If, in the referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

, a majority of the eligible handlers in the area in which the referendum is conducted, who vote therein, shall vote in the affirmative and in favor of levying and collecting the assessment proposed in the referendum, then such assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 12, effective July 15, 1980.

247.862.
Notice as to deduction required — Use of funds collected — Records to be open for inspection.

In the event a majority of the eligible handlers in the referendum who vote therein shall vote in favor of the assessment, then the Commissioner shall notify forthwith, by registered or certified mail, all handlers of eggs engaged in the business of purchasing or selling eggs in this state, that on and after the date specified in such letter, the specified assessment shall be in effect. The assessment shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the month in which the handler purchased or sold eggs, be remitted to the duly certified association which conducted the referendum. Such funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations and grants from state or governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of promoting and stimulating by advertising, research and other methods the increased production, use and sale, domestic and foreign, of eggs. The books and records of all handlers shall at all times be open for inspection by the Commissioner or his duly authorized agents during regular business hours.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 13, effective July 15, 1980.

247.863.
Refund of assessment collected.

In the event the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any handler upon and against whom such assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

, if dissatisfied with said assessment and the result thereof, shall have the right to demand of and receive from the treasurer of the certified association a refund of the assessment collected; provided, such demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days from the date on which the assessment is collected from the handler.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 14, effective July 15, 1980.

247.864.
Annual review of assessment program — Termination of program.

The board shall review the assessment program annually. If, at the end of each year after the first year of the assessment program, the board determines that there is dissatisfaction with the program, the Commissioner shall then conduct a referendum among the handlers in the area. If upon the referendum, a majority of the handlers voting in the area reject the program, it shall be terminated at the end of the year in which the referendum for the area was conducted; otherwise, the assessment program shall continue in force and effect.

If the duly certified association expresses in writing its desire to the Commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the program, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the year in which the board action is taken; and, in this event, the Commissioner shall notify, by registered or certified mail, the handlers affected thereby of the termination of the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 15, effective July 15, 1980.

247.865.
Injunction against violations.

Whenever in the judgment of the board or the duly certified association, a handler has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.864

, the board or the duly certified association may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining such act, or acts or practices and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against the handler.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 120, § 16, effective July 15, 1980.